California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(E) A person employed by, or acting as an agent on behalf of, an entity or agency described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) who is acting within the course and scope of that employment or agency, and a public officer of an agency described in subparagraph (C) acting in the course and scope of official duties.

(F) A person whose sole activity as a professional fiduciary is as a broker-dealer, broker-dealer agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative registered and regulated under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code), the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80b-1 et seq.), or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78a et seq.), or involves serving as a trustee to a company regulated by the Securities and
 Exchange Commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.).

(g) “Committee” means the Professional Fiduciaries Advisory Committee, as established pursuant to Section 6511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

(a) Every person who is required to register with the Statewide Registry maintained by the Department of Justice under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2850) of Part 4 of Division 4 of the Probate Code prior to January 1, 2007, shall be required to obtain a license as a professional fiduciary under this chapter.

(b) Every person who is required to file information with the clerk of the court under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2340) of Chapter 3 of Part 4 of Division 4 of the Probate Code prior to January 1, 2007, shall be required to obtain a license as a professional fiduciary under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [6510. - 6520.]

6510.

(a) There is within the jurisdiction of the department the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau. The bureau is under the supervision and control of the director. The duty of enforcing and administering this chapter is vested in the chief of the bureau, who is responsible to the director. Every power granted or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy director or by the chief, subject to conditions and limitations as the director may prescribe.

(b) The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, the chief of the bureau, at a salary to be fixed and determined by the director with the approval of the
 Director of Finance. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director and at the pleasure of the Governor.

(c) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the repeal of this section renders the bureau subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 2.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6511.

(a) There is within the bureau a Professional Fiduciaries Advisory Committee. The committee shall consist of seven members; three of whom shall be licensees actively engaged as professional fiduciaries in this state, and four of whom shall be public members. One of the public members shall be a member of a nonprofit organization advocating on behalf of the elderly, and one of the public members shall be a probate court investigator.

(b) The Governor shall appoint the member from a nonprofit organization advocating on behalf of the elderly, the probate court investigator, and the three licensees. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly
 shall each appoint a public member.

(c) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), each member of the committee shall be appointed for a term of four years, and shall hold office until the appointment of their successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which they were appointed, whichever first occurs.

(1) Commencing January 1, 2027, the Governor shall appoint a licensee member and a public member from a nonprofit organization advocating on behalf of the elderly to a term of two years each. Commencing January 1, 2029, the Governor shall resume appointing these committee positions to four-year terms.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2027, the Governor shall appoint a licensee
 member and a probate court investigator to a term of three years each. Commencing January 1, 2030, the Governor shall resume appointing these committee positions to four-year terms.

(d) Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing power for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur. A person shall not serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms.

(e) Every member of the committee shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Sections 103 and 113.

(f) The committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Examine the functions and policies of the bureau and make recommendations with respect to policies, practices, and regulations
 as may be deemed important and necessary by the director or the chief to promote the interests of consumers or that otherwise promote the welfare of the public.

(2) Consider and make appropriate recommendations to the bureau in any matter relating to professional fiduciaries in this state.

(3) Provide assistance as may be requested by the bureau in the exercise of its powers or duties.

(4) Meet at least once each quarter. All meetings of the committee shall be public meetings.

(g) The bureau shall meet and consult with the committee regarding general policy issues related to professional fiduciaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 3.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6513.

The bureau may employ, subject to civil service and other provisions of law, other employees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter under the direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.

The bureau shall keep a complete record of all its proceedings and all licenses issued, renewed, or revoked, and a detailed statement of receipts and disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6515.

The duty of administering and enforcing this chapter is vested in the bureau and the chief. In the performance of this duty, the bureau and the chief have all of the powers of, and are subject to all of the responsibilities vested in and imposed upon, the head of a department by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6516.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the bureau in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6517.

The bureau may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), regulations necessary to enable the bureau to carry into effect the provisions of law relating to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6518.

(a) The bureau shall be responsible for administering the licensing and regulatory program established in this chapter.

(b) The bureau shall approve classes qualifying for prelicense education, as well as classes qualifying for annual continuing education required by this chapter. The bureau shall maintain a current list of all approved classes.

(c) The bureau shall arrange for the preparation and administration of
 licensing examinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6520.

The bureau shall adopt, by regulation, a Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics. The Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics shall be consistent with all statutory requirements, as well as requirements developed by the courts and the Judicial Council. The Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics shall be provided electronically on the bureau’s Internet Web site and to persons who request an application for licensure. The bureau may, by regulation, amend the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics from time to time, as it deems necessary, provided that no amendment
 shall be effective with regard to a licensee until the licensee’s next annual license renewal cycle, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 6541, is completed. Any amendment to the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics shall be included in the license renewal materials sent to a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensing [6530. - 6543.]

6530.

(a) On and after January 1, 2009, no person shall act or hold themselves out to the public as a professional fiduciary unless that person is licensed as a professional fiduciary in accordance with this chapter.

(b) This section does not apply to a person licensed as an attorney under the State Bar Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000)).

(c) This section does not apply to a person licensed as, and acting within the scope of practice of, a certified public accountant pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 3.

(d) This
 section does not apply to a person enrolled as an agent to practice before the Internal Revenue Service only when acting within the scope of practice pursuant to Part 10 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Actions taken by an enrolled agent, when serving as a fiduciary, which are beyond the scope of their license to practice as an enrolled agent is unlicensed activity and subject to discipline under Section 146 unless the enrolled agent is also licensed as a professional fiduciary in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 8.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6531.

A professional fiduciary shall not operate with an expired, suspended, retired, canceled, or revoked license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (AB 2024)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6532.

Only a person who holds a current and active license from the bureau may identify themselves as a “licensed professional fiduciary.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 9.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6533.

In order to meet the qualifications for licensure as a professional fiduciary a person shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be at least 21 years of age.

(b) Have not committed any acts that are grounds for denial of a license under Section 480 or 6536.

(c) Submit fingerprint images as specified in Section 6533.5 in order to obtain criminal offender record information.

(d) Have completed the required prelicensing education described in Section 6538.

(e) Have passed the licensing examination administered by the bureau
 pursuant to Section 6539.

(f) Have at least one of the following:

(1) A baccalaureate degree of arts or sciences from a college or university accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting body of colleges and universities or a higher level of education.

(2) An associate of arts or sciences degree from a college or university accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting body of colleges and universities, and at least three years of experience with either of the following substantive fiduciary responsibilities:

(A) Serving as a conservator of a person, estate, or person and estate, a guardian of
 a person, estate, or person and estate, a trustee, an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, an agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as specified in Section 6501.

(B) Working for a professional fiduciary, a public agency, or a financial institution acting as a conservator of a person, estate, or person and estate, a guardian of a person,
 estate, or person and estate,
 a trustee, an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, an agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as specified in Section 6501.

(3) At least five years of experience with either of the following substantive fiduciary responsibilities:

(A) Serving as a conservator of a person, estate, or person and estate, a guardian of
 a person, estate, or person and estate, a trustee, an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, an agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as specified in Section 6501.

(B) Working for a professional fiduciary, a public agency, or a financial institution acting as a conservator of a person, estate, or person and estate, a guardian of
 a person, estate, or person and estate,
 a trustee, an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, an agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as specified in Section 6501.

(g) Agree to adhere to the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics and to all statutes and regulations.

(h) Consent to the bureau conducting a credit check on the applicant.

(i) File a completed application for licensure with the bureau on a form provided by the bureau and signed by the applicant under
 penalty of perjury.

(j) Submit with the license application a nonrefundable application fee, as specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6533.5.

(a) The bureau shall require an applicant for licensure as a professional fiduciary to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The bureau shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for an individual specified in subdivision (a) who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the bureau pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The bureau shall request from the Department of Justice
 subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 3.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6534.

(a) The bureau shall maintain the following information in each licensee’s file, shall make this information available to a court for any purpose, including the determination of the appropriateness of appointing, continuing the appointment of, or removing, the licensee as a conservator, guardian, trustee, personal representative of decedent’s estate, agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a position arising from an appointment as a professional fiduciary practice administrator, and shall otherwise keep this information confidential, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section:

(1) The names
 of the licensee’s current conservatees, wards, principals under a durable power of attorney for health care, or principals under a durable power of attorney for finances, and the names of the trusts or estates currently administered by the licensee, whether the case is court supervised or non-court supervised.

(2) The aggregate dollar value of all assets currently under the licensee’s supervision as a professional fiduciary.

(3) The licensee’s current addresses and telephone numbers for their place of business and place of residence.

(4) Whether the licensee has ever been removed for cause as a conservator, guardian, trustee, personal representative of a decedent’s estate, agent under a durable power of attorney for health
 care, or agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or has ever resigned or settled a matter in which a complaint against the licensee has been filed with the court as a conservator, guardian, trustee, personal representative of a decedent’s estate, agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, or agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a position arising from an appointment as a professional fiduciary practice administrator, in a specific case.

(5) The circumstances causing a removal or resignation described in paragraph (4) and the case names, court locations, and case numbers associated with the removal or resignation.

(6) The case names, court locations, and case numbers of all conservatorship, guardianship, trust, or other estate administration cases
 that are closed for which the licensee served as the conservator, guardian, trustee, agent under a durable power of attorney for finance or health care, personal representative of a decedent’s estate, or professional fiduciary practice administrator, whether the case is court supervised or non-court supervised.

(7) Information regarding any discipline imposed upon the licensee by the bureau.

(8) Whether the licensee has filed for bankruptcy or held a controlling financial interest in a business that filed for bankruptcy in the last 10 years.

(b) The bureau shall make the information in paragraphs (2), (4), (7), and (8) of subdivision (a) available to the public.

(c) The bureau shall also publish information regarding licensees on the Internet as specified in Section 27. The information shall include, but shall not be limited to, information regarding license status and the information specified under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 6.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6535.

The bureau shall approve or deny licensure in a timely manner to applicants who apply for licensure. Upon approval of a license, the bureau shall notify the applicant of issuance of the license, and shall issue a license certificate identifying him or her as a “licensed professional fiduciary.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6536.

The bureau shall review all applications for licensure and may investigate an applicant’s qualifications for licensure. The bureau shall approve those applications that meet the requirements for licensure, but shall not issue a license to any applicant who meets any of the following criteria:

(a) Does not meet the qualifications for licensure under this chapter.

(b) Has been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fiduciary.

(c) Has engaged in fraud or deceit in applying for a license under this chapter.

(d) Has engaged in dishonesty, fraud, or gross negligence in performing the functions or duties of a fiduciary, including engaging in such conduct prior to January 1, 2009.

(e) Has been removed as a fiduciary by a court for breach of trust committed intentionally, with gross negligence, in bad faith, or with reckless indifference, or has demonstrated a pattern of negligent conduct, including a removal prior to January 1, 2009, and all appeals have been taken, or the time to file an appeal has expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 83.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6537.

The bureau may deny a license for the reasons specified in Section 480 or 6536. An applicant notified of the denial of his or her application for licensure shall have the right to appeal to the bureau as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6538.

(a) (1) To qualify for licensure, an applicant shall have completed 30 hours of prelicensing education courses provided by an educational program approved by the bureau.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2023, the prelicensing education courses shall include at least one hour of instruction in cultural competency.

(b) (1) To renew a license, or to restore a license from retired status to active status, a licensee shall complete 15 hours of approved continuing education courses each annual renewal cycle.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2023, as part
 of the approved continuing education courses required by paragraph (1), a licensee shall complete at least two hours of instruction in ethics, two hours of instruction in cultural competency, or two hours of instruction in both ethics and cultural competency every annual renewal cycle.

(c) The cost of any educational course required by this chapter shall not be borne by any client served by a licensee.

(d) For purposes of this section, “cultural competency” means understanding and applying cultural and ethnic data to the process of providing services that includes, but is not limited to, information on the appropriate services for the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and intersex communities, ethnic communities, and religious communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 35.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6539.

As a requirement for licensure, an applicant shall take and pass the licensing examination administered by the bureau. The bureau shall determine the frequency with which the examination will be given. The bureau shall also determine the frequency with which an applicant for reexamination may sit for the examination. The bureau shall administer the examination through a computer-based examination process and may also administer the examination through other means.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6540.

Individuals, entities, agencies, and associations that propose to offer educational programs qualifying for the prelicensing educational or continuing educational requirements of this chapter shall apply for and obtain the approval of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6541.

(a) A license shall expire one year after it was issued on the last day of the month in which it was issued.

(b) A license may be renewed by filing a renewal application with the bureau, submitting the annual statement required by Section 6561, submitting proof of the licensee’s compliance with the continuing education requirements of this chapter, and payment of the renewal fee set by the bureau, provided that the licensee has not engaged in conduct that would justify the bureau’s refusal to grant the renewal. Acts justifying the bureau’s refusal to renew a license shall include any of the following:

(1) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fiduciary.

(2) Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license under this chapter.

(3) Dishonesty, fraud, or gross negligence in performing the functions or duties of a professional fiduciary.

(4) Removal by a court as a fiduciary for breach of fiduciary duty if all appeals have been taken or the time to file an appeal has expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6541.1.

(a) A license that is not renewed within three years following its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, or reinstated, and the license shall be canceled immediately upon expiration of the three-year period.

(b) A canceled license may be reinstated if the applicant satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) Submits an application for licensure and fulfills all application requirements pursuant to Section 6533.

(2) Completes 15 hours of continuing education during the preceding calendar year in addition to any educational requirements specified in
 Section 6533.

(3) Submits fingerprint images as specified in Section 6533.5 in order to obtain criminal offender record information.

(4) Passes the licensing examination pursuant to Section 6539.

(5) Not subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 7.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6542.

(a) The bureau may establish, by regulation, a system for the placement of a license into retired status, upon application and submission to the bureau of a statement as required by Section 6561, for a professional fiduciary who is not actively engaged in the practice of a professional fiduciary or any activity that requires them to be licensed by the bureau.

(b) The bureau shall deny an applicant’s application to place a license in retired status if the license is subject to an outstanding order of the bureau, suspended, placed on probation, revoked, or otherwise restricted by the bureau, or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license or submit an annual statement pursuant to Section 6561.

(d) The bureau shall establish minimum qualifications to place a license in retired status.

(e) The bureau shall establish minimum qualifications for the restoration of a license from retired status to active status. These minimum qualifications shall include, but are not limited to, completion of continuing education hours as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 6538, submission of a statement as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 6561, and payment of a fee as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 6592.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 8.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6543.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or surrendered may petition the bureau for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision or from the date of the denial of a similar petition. The director may specify a longer period that must elapse, not to exceed three years, in any decision revoking the license, accepting the surrender of the license due to pending disciplinary action, or denying reinstatement of the license.

(b) A person whose license has not been revoked or surrendered but who has been disciplined by imposition of a suspension or otherwise disciplined may petition
 the bureau for reinstatement or reduction of penalty after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision.

(c) The director shall rule on the petition and impose any terms and conditions that the director reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty, including, but not limited to, issuing a probationary license or requiring additional continuing education prior to reinstatement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 9.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Practice Provisions [6560. - 6563.]

6560.

A licensee shall keep complete and accurate client records, and shall make those records available for audit or review by the bureau upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 36.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6561.

(a) A licensee shall initially, and annually thereafter, file with the bureau a statement under penalty of perjury containing the following:

(1) The licensee’s business address, telephone number, and facsimile number.

(2) Whether or not the licensee has been removed for cause as a conservator,
 guardian, trustee, personal
 representative of a decedent’s estate, agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, or a position arising from appointment as a professional fiduciary practice administrator. The licensee may file an additional statement of the issues and facts pertaining to the case.

(3) The names of the licensee’s current conservatees, wards, principals under a durable power of attorney for health care, or principals under a durable power of attorney for finances, and the names of trusts
 and decedent’s estates currently administered by the licensee, whether the cases are court supervised or non-court supervised, and including court names, court locations, and case numbers where applicable.

(4) The case names, court locations, and case numbers of all conservatorship, guardianship, trust and other estate administration cases that are closed for which the licensee served as the conservator, guardian, trustee, agent under a durable power of attorney for finance or health care, and personal representative of a decedent’s estate, whether the case is court supervised or non-court supervised. 

(5) Whether
 the licensee has been found by a court to have breached a fiduciary duty.

(6) Whether the licensee has resigned or settled a matter in which a complaint against the licensee has been
 filed with the court,
 along with the case number and a statement of the issues and facts pertaining to the allegations.

(7) Any licenses or professional certificates held by the licensee.

(8) Any ownership or beneficial interests in businesses or
 other enterprises held by the licensee or by a family member that receives or has received payments from a client of the licensee.

(9) Whether the licensee has filed for bankruptcy or held a controlling financial interest in a business that filed for bankruptcy in the last ten years.

(10) The name of any persons or entities that have
 an interest in the licensee’s professional fiduciary business.

(11) Whether the licensee has been convicted of a crime.

(b) The statement by the licensee required by this section may be filed electronically with the bureau, in a form approved by the bureau. However, any additional statement filed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be filed in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6561.5.

(a) A licensee shall respond to any written inquiry relating to the investigation of a complaint against a licensee by the bureau within 30 calendar days. The failure of, or refusal by, a licensee to respond to the written inquiry shall constitute a cause for disciplinary action.

(b) A licensee shall provide true and accurate information and responses to questions, subpoenas, interrogatories or other requests for information or documents and not take any action to obstruct any bureau inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding. Any failure to comply with this subdivision shall constitute a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 10.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6562.

The annual statement shall be filed with the bureau 60 days prior to the expiration of the license as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 6541.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6562.5.

(a) A licensee shall notify the bureau in writing of their intent not to renew their license and submit a final annual statement in accordance with Section 6561 and Section 4542 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, as it read on January 1, 2023, demonstrating they are no longer subject to licensure under this chapter.

(b) The written notice of nonpractice and final annual statement shall be submitted to the bureau 60 days before closing their business, ceasing practice as a professional fiduciary, or the expiration of their professional fiduciary license, whichever comes first.

(c) The bureau shall provide the licensee with any discrepancies between the final annual statement and the bureau’s records and the licensee shall comply with the bureau to address and resolve any outstanding matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 11.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6563.

(a) On or before January 1, 2023, a licensee with an internet website shall post on that internet website a schedule or range of the licensee’s fees, including, but not limited to, hourly fees, for services offered. 

(b) On or after January 1, 2023, a licensee who does not have an internet website shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide a prospective client, before the execution of a contract for services, a schedule or range of the licensee’s fees, including, but not limited to, hourly fees, for services offered. 

(2) Upon receipt of
 a request, provide a client with a schedule or range of the licensee’s fees, including, but not limited to, hourly fees, for services offered.

(3) If the prospective or current client is a proposed or current conservatee, provide all interested persons, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1822 of the Probate Code, with a schedule or range of the licensee’s fees, including, but not limited to, hourly fees, for services offered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement and Disciplinary Proceedings [6580. - 6584.]

6580.

(a) (1) The bureau may upon its own, and shall, upon the receipt of a complaint from any person, investigate the actions of a professional fiduciary, including a person with a license that either restricts or prohibits the practice of that person as a professional fiduciary, including, but not limited to, a license that is retired, inactive, canceled, or suspended.

(2) The bureau shall investigate a professional fiduciary’s alleged violation of statute, regulation, or the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics and any other complaint referred to it by the public, a public agency, or the department, and shall impose sanctions upon a finding
 that the professional fiduciary did any of the following: 

(A) Breached a legal or fiduciary duty to a client and thereby caused financial or physical harm or mental suffering to the client. 

(B) Abused an
 elder or a dependent
 adult client, as defined in Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 

(C) Violated a statute or regulation related to this chapter.

(3) Paragraph (2) applies, but is not limited to, all of the following referrals:

(A) (i) A report from a court that the court has taken any of the following actions:

(I) Imposed a penalty on the professional fiduciary, as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 1051 of the Probate Code.

(II) Removed the professional
 fiduciary as a conservator or guardian for cause, as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2653 of the Probate Code.

(III) Determined that the professional fiduciary has abused a conservatee, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 2112 of the Probate Code.

(ii) The report from the court pursuant to this subparagraph shall include a copy of the court’s finding and order and may include other supporting documentation. However, failure of the court to provide supporting documentation does not relieve the bureau of its duty to take action.

(B) A certified copy of a judicial or administrative finding that a professional fiduciary’s violation of law, breach of fiduciary duty, or abuse, as defined in
 Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, caused harm to a conservatee or ward in their care.

(4) If a court makes a referral described in paragraph (2), the court shall provide the bureau, at no charge, with access to the information, including confidential information, regarding its investigation of the professional fiduciary that is contained in court records. The bureau shall not disclose any confidential information contained in court records and shall use that information only for purposes of investigating allegations against the professional fiduciary or in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding brought by the bureau against the professional fiduciary. Confidential information derived from a court record and filed in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding shall be kept in the confidential
 portion of the court case file. If the bureau does not bring a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding against the professional fiduciary as a result of the allegation, the bureau shall destroy the records in its possession that contain confidential information as soon as it determined that no further action will be taken regarding the allegations. This paragraph does not affect the admissibility of confidential information as evidence in a criminal proceeding.

(b) Sanctions shall include any of the following:

(1) Administrative citations and fines as provided in Section 125.9 for a violation of this chapter,
 the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics, or any regulation adopted under this chapter.

(2) License suspension, probation, or revocation.

(c) The bureau shall provide on its internet website information regarding sanctions imposed by the bureau on licensees, including, but not limited to, information regarding citations, fines, suspensions, and revocations of licenses or other related enforcement action taken by the bureau relative to the licensee.

(d) The bureau shall revoke the professional fiduciary’s license if it finds that the professional fiduciary did either of the following:

(1) Knowingly, intentionally, or willfully breached a legal or fiduciary duty to an elder or dependent adult client that constitutes abuse of the client, as defined in Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Caused serious physical or financial harm or mental suffering to a client through gross negligence or gross incompetence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6581.

A licensee, or an agent working on behalf of a licensee, including an attorney, shall not bill a client or impose a fee on the estate or trust of a client for responding to a complaint filed with the bureau against the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 681, Sec. 6.   (AB 3144)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6581.1.
